Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.370

Automatic registration—Registration of person ineligible to vote.

(1) If a person who is ineligible to vote becomes, in the rare occasion, registered to vote under RCW 29A.08.355 or 29A.08.362 in the absence of a knowing violation by that person of RCW 29A.84.140, that person shall be deemed to have performed an authorized act of registration and such act may not be considered as evidence of a claim to citizenship.

(2) Unless a person willfully and knowingly votes or attempts to vote knowing that he or she is not entitled to vote, a person who is ineligible to vote and becomes registered to vote under RCW 29A.08.355 or 29A.08.362, and subsequently votes or attempts to vote in an election held after the effective date of the person's registration, is not guilty of violating RCW 29A.84.130, and shall be deemed to have performed an authorized act, and such act may not be considered as evidence of a claim to citizenship.

(3) A person who is ineligible to vote, who successfully completes the voter registration process under RCW 29A.08.355 or 29A.08.362 or votes in an election, must have their voter registration, or record of vote, removed from the voter registration database and any other application records.

(4) Should an ineligible individual become registered to vote, the office of the secretary of state and the relevant agency shall jointly determine the cause. If the cause is found to be intentional registration of ineligible persons by a person employed by the state or county government tasked with assisting the public with voter registration, that government employee is subject to the penalties of RCW 29A.84.110.

[ 2023 c 466 s 19; 2018 c 110 s 203.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: See notes following RCW 29A.08.355.